Massachusetts, session 194th, S897.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting, after section 51k, the following section:-
Section 51M. Hospital Price Transparency
(a) Every hospital shall make available to the public on its website a machine-readable
file containing a list of all standard charges for all items and services provided by the hospital in
accordance with 45 C.F.R. § 180.50, as amended. As used in this section, “hospital,” “items and
services,” “machine-readable,” and “standard charge” have the same meaning as set forth in 45
C.F.R § 180.20.
(b) Every hospital shall, upon request of a patient scheduled to receive an elective
procedure, test or service to be performed by the hospital, or upon request of such patients’
of 2

legally authorized representative, made no less than 3 days in advance of the date on which such
elective procedure, test or service is scheduled to be performed, furnish the patient with an
estimate of the payment amount for which the participant will be responsible for such elective
procedure, test or service. Every hospital shall provide written information about the patient’s
ability to request an estimate of the payment amount pursuant to this section. Such written
information shall be posted conspicuously in public areas of the hospital, including admissions or
registration areas, and included on any website maintained by the hospital.
(c) The department shall promulgate regulations for the purpose of implementing this act.
(d) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, violations of this act shall
be deemed an unfair and deceptive act pursuant to the provisions of chapter 93A, and the
attorney general is hereby authorized to bring an action under section 4 of chapter 93A to enforce
this provision and to obtain restitution, civil penalties, injunctive relief and any other relief
awarded pursuant to chapter 93A.
of 2